Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
103

EXPENDITURE
OF PUBLIC MONEY AND PUBLIC CONTRACTS

Part I. General Provisions

Section

103-1 What warrants prohibited

103-1.5 Definitions

103-2 General fund

103-3 Repealed

103-4 Expenditure from general appropriation unlawful,
when

103-5 Emergency expenditures from general
appropriations

103-6 Temporary use of funds

103-7 Capital improvements; authorizations for;
emergency

repairs or reconstruction, exception

103-8 Repealed

103-8.5 Works of art special fund

103-9 False certificates or approval; penalty

103-10 Payment for goods and services

103-10.5 Prompt payment

103-11 Rules of comptroller

103-12 Capital improvement projects; personnel
training;

management

103-15 Repealed

Part II. Public Works and Contracts

103-21 to 32 Repealed

103-32.1 Contract provision for retainage;
subcontractors

103-32.2 Substitution of retainage

103-33 to 39 Repealed

103-39.5 Construction, renovation, or repair of
school

facilities; county permit exemption

103-40 Federal-aid highway contracts

103-41 to 49 Repealed

103-50 Building design to consider needs of
persons with

disabilities; review fees

103-50.5 to 52 Repealed

103-53 Contracts with the State or counties; tax
clearances,

assignments

103-53.5, 54 Repealed

103-55 Wages, hours, and working conditions of
employees of

contractors performing services

103-55.5 Wages and hours of employees on public
works

construction contracts

103-55.6 Public works construction; apprenticeship
agreement

103-56 to 60 Repealed

Part III. Pollution Control--Repealed

103-61 Repealed

Part IV. Additional Procurement Procedures

103-71 Repealed

103-72 Transcription of instructional materials

Part V. Products and Services of
Handicapped

Individuals--Repealed

103-81 to 83 Repealed

Note

Department of accounting and general services; status report
to 2017 legislature on implementation of practices required by L 2016, c 241.
L 2016, c 241, §3.

Cross References

Employment of state residents on construction
procurement contracts, see chapter 103B.

Hawaii public
procurement code, see chapter 103D.

Law Journals and Reviews

Emerging Trends in
International, Federal, and State and Local Government Procurement in an Era of
Global Economic Stimulus Funding. 32 UH L. Rev. 29.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next